Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,163
Merger of districts; indebtedness; responsibility; succession to property.

Whenever two or more districts are involved in a merger plan, such districts shall continue to be responsible for any indebtedness incurred before the merger takes place unless a different arrangement is included in the plan voted upon by the electors; Provided, that when the voters approve such merger, the merged district shall succeed to all the property, contracts and obligations of all the districts so merged into it and shall assume all of their valid contracts and obligations.

Laws 1972, LB 1509, § 11.